Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.183

Technical assistance.

(1) Beginning with the 2023-24 school year, the commission shall promote the effective administration and operation of charter schools through the provision of technical assistance to requesting charter schools, charter school boards, or both.

(2) The principal objective of technical assistance provided in accordance with this section, which may be provided by commission staff or through a contractor, must be to support charter schools and charter school boards in achieving and maintaining compliance with the requirements of this chapter and other provisions of Title 28A RCW governing the operation of charter schools. In responding to requests for technical assistance, the commission shall prioritize the provision of assistance to charter schools that have been in operation for three or fewer school years.

(3) Technical assistance provided in accordance with this section: May only be provided at the request of the applicable charter school or charter school board; and is unrelated to, and does not affect or otherwise modify, duties of the commission in its role as an authorizer.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "technical assistance" means the provision of training, which may be provided by commission staff or through a contractor, to support charter schools and charter school boards in their responsibility to achieve and maintain compliance with applicable state and federal laws and with their charter school contract.

[ 2023 c 356 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 356: See note following RCW 28A.710.030.